Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3. Special Club Licenses

§ 12-4-301.
Sales by clubs; license fees; petition; license restrictions.

Bona fide clubs as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(iii) may be licensed by the appropriate licensing authority under a limited retail liquor license for which the licensee shall pay a license fee of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) annually in advance.

At least fifty-one percent (51%) of the membership of a social club as defined by W.S. 12-1-101(a)(iii)(E) shall sign a petition indicating a desire to secure a limited retail liquor license. The form of the petition shall be prescribed by the division and shall include the residence address of each member signing the petition.

Except as otherwise provided by W.S. 12-5-201(f), a club holding a limited retail license may sell alcoholic or malt beverages for consumption anywhere on the licensed premises for consumption by its members and their accompanied guests only as approved by the local licensing authority.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 92, § 3.

A political subdivision of the state may hold no more than two (2) club limited retail liquor licenses for golf courses owned, maintained or operated by that political subdivision in addition to any other license held by that political subdivision. For purposes of this subsection, a political subdivision may contract for or otherwise subcontract the operations of a golf course or any food and beverage service associated with the golf course to another individual or entity without transferring the club limited retail liquor license held under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 53-215; Laws 1953, ch. 54, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-18; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-115; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 3; 1995, ch. 88, § 1; 2009, ch. 42, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 30, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (e).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (b).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “may sell” for “shall not sell,” substituted “anywhere on” for “except within,” inserted “as approved by the local licensing authority,” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “It shall be the duty and obligation of the club to check and regulate sales to members and their accompanied guests to insure that all alcoholic or malt beverages sold are consumed within the building, space or premises.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "12-5-201(f)" for "12-5-201(g)" in (c); deleted "Notwithstanding W.S. 12-4-103(b)" at the beginning of (e) and made related changes.

The 2022 amendment,

added the second sentence in (e).

Laws 2022, ch. 30, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal liability of member or agent of private club or association, or of owner or lessor of its premises, for violation of state or local liquor or gambling laws thereon, 98 ALR3d 694.

§§ 12-4-302 and 12-4-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 103, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 20, §§ 1, 2, and 3, defined “bottle club” and provided the penalty for operating an unlicensed bottle club.